Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2888
Delegated dispensing permit; licensed
health care professionals; training required.

A delegating
pharmacist shall conduct the training of all licensed health care professionals
specified in subdivision (1) of section 38-2884 and who are dispensing pursuant
to the delegated dispensing permit of a public health clinic. The training
shall be approved in advance by the board.

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 1108, § 20;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 80;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 20;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 62;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.57;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 984;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 6.